st.aff
FLAG long
SFX xC Y 43
SFX xC oire oire/ boire # po:infi
SFX xC oire uvant/ boire # po:ppre
SFX xC oire u/ boire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX xC oire us/ boire # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX xC oire ue/ boire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xC oire ues/ boire # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xC oire ois/ boire # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xC oire oit/ boire # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX xC oire uvons/ boire # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX xC oire uvez/ boire # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX xC oire oivent/ boire # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX xC oire uvais/ boire # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xC oire uvait/ boire # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX xC oire uvions/ boire # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX xC oire uviez/ boire # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX xC oire uvaient/ boire # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX xC oire us/ boire # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xC oire ut/ boire # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX xC oire ûmes/ boire # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX xC oire ûtes/ boire # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX xC oire urent/ boire # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX xC oire oirai/ boire # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX xC oire oiras/ boire # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX xC oire oira/ boire # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX xC oire oirons/ boire # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX xC oire oirez/ boire # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX xC oire oiront/ boire # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX xC oire oirais/ boire # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xC oire oirait/ boire # po:cond po:3sg
SFX xC oire oirions/ boire # po:cond po:1pl
SFX xC oire oiriez/ boire # po:cond po:2pl
SFX xC oire oiraient/ boire # po:cond po:3pl
SFX xC oire oive/ boire # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX xC oire oives/ boire # po:spre po:2sg
SFX xC oire usse/ boire # po:simp po:1sg
SFX xC oire usses/ boire # po:simp po:2sg
SFX xC oire ût/ boire # po:simp po:3sg
SFX xC oire ussions/ boire # po:simp po:1pl
SFX xC oire ussiez/ boire # po:simp po:2pl
SFX xC oire ussent/ boire # po:simp po:3pl
SFX xC oire ois/ boire # po:impe po:2sg
SFX xC oire uvons/ boire # po:impe po:1pl
SFX xC oire uvez/ boire # po:impe po:2pl

SFX xJ Y 4
SFX xJ clure clure/ clure # po:infi
SFX xJ clure clus/ clure # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX xJ clure cluse/ clure # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xJ clure cluses/ clure # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl

SFX xK Y 40
SFX xK clure clure/ clure # po:infi
SFX xK clure cluant/ clure # po:ppre
SFX xK clure clus/ clure # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX xK clure cluse/ clure # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xK clure cluses/ clure # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xK clure clus/ clure # po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xK clure clut/ clure # po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX xK clure cluons/ clure # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX xK clure cluez/ clure # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX xK clure cluent/ clure # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX xK clure cluais/ clure # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xK clure cluait/ clure # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX xK clure cluions/ clure # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX xK clure cluiez/ clure # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX xK clure cluaient/ clure # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX xK clure clûmes/ clure # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX xK clure clûtes/ clure # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX xK clure clurent/ clure # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX xK clure clurai/ clure # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX xK clure cluras/ clure # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX xK clure clura/ clure # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX xK clure clurons/ clure # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX xK clure clurez/ clure # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX xK clure cluront/ clure # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX xK clure clurais/ clure # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xK clure clurait/ clure # po:cond po:3sg
SFX xK clure clurions/ clure # po:cond po:1pl
SFX xK clure cluriez/ clure # po:cond po:2pl
SFX xK clure cluraient/ clure # po:cond po:3pl
SFX xK clure clue/ clure # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX xK clure clues/ clure # po:spre po:2sg
SFX xK clure clusse/ clure # po:simp po:1sg
SFX xK clure clusses/ clure # po:simp po:2sg
SFX xK clure clût/ clure # po:simp po:3sg
SFX xK clure clussions/ clure # po:simp po:1pl
SFX xK clure clussiez/ clure # po:simp po:2pl
SFX xK clure clussent/ clure # po:simp po:3pl
SFX xK clure clus/ clure # po:impe po:2sg
SFX xK clure cluons/ clure # po:impe po:1pl
SFX xK clure cluez/ clure # po:impe po:2pl

SFX xL Y 44
SFX xL clure clure/ clure # po:infi
SFX xL clure cluant/ clure # po:ppre
SFX xL clure clus/ inclure # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX xL clure cluse/ inclure # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xL clure cluses/ inclure # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xL clure clu/ [eo].clure # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX xL clure clus/ [eo].clure # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX xL clure clue/ [eo].clure # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xL clure clues/ [eo].clure # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xL clure clus/ clure # po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xL clure clut/ clure # po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX xL clure cluons/ clure # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX xL clure cluez/ clure # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX xL clure cluent/ clure # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX xL clure cluais/ clure # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xL clure cluait/ clure # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX xL clure cluions/ clure # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX xL clure cluiez/ clure # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX xL clure cluaient/ clure # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX xL clure clûmes/ clure # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX xL clure clûtes/ clure # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX xL clure clurent/ clure # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX xL clure clurai/ clure # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX xL clure cluras/ clure # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX xL clure clura/ clure # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX xL clure clurons/ clure # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX xL clure clurez/ clure # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX xL clure cluront/ clure # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX xL clure clurais/ clure # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX xL clure clurait/ clure # po:cond po:3sg
SFX xL clure clurions/ clure # po:cond po:1pl
SFX xL clure cluriez/ clure # po:cond po:2pl
SFX xL clure cluraient/ clure # po:cond po:3pl
SFX xL clure clue/ clure # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX xL clure clues/ clure # po:spre po:2sg
SFX xL clure clusse/ clure # po:simp po:1sg
SFX xL clure clusses/ clure # po:simp po:2sg
SFX xL clure clût/ clure # po:simp po:3sg
SFX xL clure clussions/ clure # po:simp po:1pl
SFX xL clure clussiez/ clure # po:simp po:2pl
SFX xL clure clussent/ clure # po:simp po:3pl
SFX xL clure clus/ clure # po:impe po:2sg
SFX xL clure cluons/ clure # po:impe po:1pl
SFX xL clure cluez/ clure # po:impe po:2pl

SFX xM Y 15
SFX xM ourdre ourdre/ sourdre # po:infi
SFX xM ourdre ourdant/ sourdre # po:ppre
SFX xM ourdre ourd/ sourdre # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX xM ourdre ourdent/ sourdre # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX xM ourdre ourdait/ sourdre # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX xM ourdre ourdaient/ sourdre # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX xM ourdre ourdit/ sourdre # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX xM ourdre ourdirent/ sourdre # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX xM ourdre ourdra/ sourdre # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX xM ourdre ourdront/ sourdre # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX xM ourdre ourdrait/ sourdre # po:cond po:3sg
SFX xM ourdre ourdraient/ sourdre # po:cond po:3pl
SFX xM ourdre ourde/ sourdre # po:spre po:3sg
SFX xM ourdre ourdît/ sourdre # po:simp po:3sg
SFX xM ourdre ourdissent/ sourdre # po:simp po:3pl
