st.dic
boire/xC  # po:v3_it_x__a
conclure/xL  # po:v3_itn___a
emboire/xC  # po:v3____p_e_
exclure/xL  # po:v3_it_q__a
inclure/xL  # po:v3__t_q__a
occlure/xK  # po:v3_it____a
reboire/xC  # po:v3_it_x__a
reclure/xJ  # po:v3_it____a
sourdre/xM  # po:v3_i______
